Utah statutes.
59-15-104.   Procedure for contesting assessment.

  If any person, after filing a return and paying the tax provided by this chapter, is aggrieved by the assessment made by the commission, the person may file a request for agency action.



Amended by Chapter 161, 1987 General Session

